New York, session 2025-2026, A10978.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 235-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 235-c. New York state geological survey. 1. The New York state 4 geological survey, originally established in the year eighteen hundred 5 thirty-six, is hereby continued as a bureau established in the New York 6 state science service established under section two hundred thirty-five 7 of this part within the state museum to inventory, research, analyze and 8 disseminate information about all rocks, minerals, geologic structures, 9 strata, geologic fluids and energy resources and the geologic framework 10 of New York state. The New York state geological survey shall: 11 (a) develop and maintain an inventory of the geological resources of 12 New York state, with special emphasis on identifying those resources 13 that are important to understanding the geological history, geologic 14 framework, geologic hazards and potential strata, rocks and minerals of 15 economic significance, or that have particular scientific, systematic, 16 or societal and environmental importance; 17 (b) conduct research on and advance the knowledge of the geological 18 materials, chronologic events, plate tectonic history, glacial history 19 and characteristics and processes that constitute or affect New York 20 state's geological framework and landscape; 21 (c) interpret and publish the results of research on New York state's 22 geological history, resources, and provide advisory services thereby 23 making information available to citizens, teachers, industry, and 24 government for educational purposes and for use in decision making; 25 (d) ensure the preservation and appropriate expansion of the state's 26 collection of scientific specimens and artifacts, conduct research on 27 such collections, and make specimens and data available for mineral EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15360-01-6 A. 10978 2 1 resource studies, geologic hazards analyses, and other research 2 projects; 3 (e) cooperate with the department of environmental conservation, 4 office of parks, recreation and historic preservation, department of 5 transportation, and other state and federal agencies, private organiza- 6 tions and institutions, corporations, and individuals interested in 7 geological resources; and 8 (f) maintain sufficient staff with geological expertise to effectively 9 map, study, research, and curate to provide advisory services and remain 10 knowledgeable on all aspects of the geology of New York state. 11 2. The New York state geological survey shall be the recognized 12 authoritative bureau within New York state government to produce geolog- 13 ical maps. Map production shall occur under the direction of a licensed 14 professional geologist serving as the chief geoscientist. The New York 15 state geological survey shall produce geological maps and conduct 16 geological mapping projects that align with the following goals: 17 (a) addressing longstanding questions regarding the natural history of 18 New York state and aligning with the research mission of the state muse- 19 um; 20 (b) engaging in the discovery, characterization, and inventory of 21 mineral resources; 22 (c) providing geologic information to protect and preserve the proper- 23 ty and livelihood of New York state citizens, the state and industry; 24 (d) addressing potential geologic hazards associated with climate 25 change; 26 (e) fostering continued education and training for future geoscien- 27 tists and providing an authoritative source of geologic information for 28 licensed professional geologists; 29 (f) raising the knowledge and opportunity for citizens to engage in 30 geoscience literacy; 31 (g) identifying potential aggregate, building and construction 32 resources to serve as raw materials to build, maintain, and repair aging 33 infrastructure; 34 (h) characterizing the geologic framework of the state to identify and 35 protect water resources; 36 (i) aligning with the state's renewable energy goals; and 37 (j) leading to the discovery of new scientific information and data to 38 promote and enhance the earth science education curriculum in K-12 39 schools. 40 3. The New York state geological survey shall not be authorized to 41 enter any privately owned lands without the written consent of the land- 42 owner, lessee, or person in control. The New York state geological 43 survey shall be authorized to enter into agreements with landowners to 44 enter private lands on such terms as may be acceptable. 45 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.